Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-175
Brand inspection area, defined.

Brand inspection area means that portion of the State of Nebraska designated in section 54-1,109, where brand inspection is mandatory.

Laws 1999, LB 778, § 6.